ko: 펀칭/트레이닝 백 모양: 각진 형태; 바나나형; 원통형; 스탠딩 원통형; 물방울(메이즈)형; T자형; 물방울형; 토르소/바디형; 어퍼컷용; 레킹볼형; 기타
hu: Boxzsák/edzőzsák formája: Döntött; Banán; Henger; Szabadon álló henger; Csepp; T-alakú; Csepp alakú; Torzó/test; Felütő; Rombológolyó; Egyéb
cs: Tvar boxovacího/tréninkového pytle: Zkosený tvar; Banán; Válcový; Volně stojící válec; Hruška; Ve tvaru T; Slza; Torzo/tělo; Na zvedáky; Demoliční koule; Jiné
zh-CN: 拳击/训练沙袋形状: 上翻角型; 香蕉型; 圆柱型; 直立圆柱型; 玉米型; T 型; 水滴型; 躯干/人体型; 上钩拳训练型; 破坏球型; 其他
bg-BG: Форма на боксовата/тренировъчната круша: Ъглова; Банан; Цилиндрична; Свободностоящ цилиндър; Круша; Т-образна; Сълза; Торс/тяло; За ъперкът; Кръгла (wrecking ball); Друго
es: Formas de sacos de boxeo/entrenamiento: En ángulo; Banana; Cilíndrico; Cilindro independiente; Maíz; En forma de T; En forma de gota; Torso/cuerpo; Uppercut; Bola de demolición; Otro
el: Σχήμα σάκου πυγμαχίας ή προπόνησης: Με γωνία; Μπανάνα; Κυλινδρικό; Ανεξάρτητος κύλινδρος; Μορφής Maize; Σχήματος T; Σχήμα δάκρυ; Κορμός/σώμα; Για άπερκατ; Wrecking ball; Άλλο
th: Shapesของกระสอบทราย/กระสอบฝึกซ้อม: ทำมุม; ทรงกล้วย; ทรงกระบอก; ทรงกระบอกตั้งพื้น; ทรงลูกแพร์; ทรงตัว T; ทรงหยดน้ำ; ทรงลำตัว; ทรงอัปเปอร์คัต; ทรงลูกตุ้ม; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Saco de pancada/treino formato: Angulado; Banana; Cilíndrico; Cilindro de chão; Maize; Em formato de T; Gota; Tronco/corpo; Uppercut; Bola de demolição (Wrecking ball); Outro
da: Bokse-/træningsboldform: Vinklet; Banan; Cylindrisk; Fritstående cylinder; Majsformet; T-formet; Dråbeformet; Overkrop/krop; Uppercut; Wrecking ball; Andet
hr-HR: Oblik vreće za udaranje/trening: Pod kutom; Banana; Cilindrični; Samostojeći cilindar; Oblik kruške; U obliku slova T; Oblik suze; Torzo/tijelo; Aperkat; Kugla za rušenje; Ostalo
zh-TW: 拳擊/訓練沙袋形狀: 有角度型; 香蕉型; 圓柱形; 獨立圓柱形; 梨形; T 字形; 水滴形; 軀幹/人體造型; 上勾拳專用; 鐵球形; 其他
lt-LT: Smūgių / treniruočių maišo forma: Kampiškas; Banano; Cilindrinis; Laisvai pastatomas cilindras; Kukurūzo formos; T formos; Ašaros formos; Liemens / kūno formos; Apatiniams smūgiams; Griaunamojo rutulio formos; Kita
fr: Forme du sac de frappe ou d’entraînement: Incliné; Banane; Cylindrique; Cylindre sur pied; Poire; En forme de T; En forme de goutte; Torse/corps; Uppercut; Boule de démolition; Autre
ja: パンチングバッグ／トレーニングバッグの形状: アングル型; バナナ型; 円柱型; 自立円柱型; メイズ型; T字型; ティアドロップ型; トルソー/ボディ型; アッパーカット型; レッキングボール型; その他
it: Shape del sacco da boxe/allenamento: Angolato; A banana; Cilindrico; Cilindro autoportante; A goccia piccola; A T; A goccia; Busto/corpo; Da montante; A palla; Altro
pl: Kształt worka bokserskiego/treningowego: Kątowy; Banan; Cylindryczny; Cylinder wolnostojący; Gruszka; W kształcie litery T; Łezka; Tułów / manekin; Worek hakowy; Kula; Inne
ro-RO: Forma sacului de box/de antrenament: Unghiular; Banană; Cilindric; Cilindru independent; Tip pară (maize); În formă de T; Lacrimă; Trunchi/corp; Uppercut; Sferic (wrecking ball); Altele
ru: Форма боксерского мешка: Угловой; Бананообразный; Цилиндрический; Отдельно стоящий цилиндр; Каплевидный; Т-образный; Каплевидный; Торс/манекен; Для апперкотов; Шар; Другое
sl-SI: Oblika vreče za boks/trening: Kotna; Banana; Valjasta; Prostostoječi valj; Hruškasta; V obliki črke T; V obliki solze; Trup/telo; Za aperkat; V obliki krogle; Drugo
nl: Stoot-/trainingstas vorm: Hoekig; Banaan; Cilindrisch; Vrijstaande cilinder; Maïszak; T-vormig; Druppelvormig; Romp/lichaam; Uppercut; Sloopkogel; Overig
sv: Boxningssäck/träningssäck – form: Vinklad; Banan; Cylindrisk; Fristående cylinder; Majsboll; T-formad; Droppformad; Överkropp/kropp; Uppercut; Slagboll; Övrigt
fi: Nyrkkeily-/harjoitussäkin muoto: Kulmikas; Banaani; Lieriömäinen; Vapaasti seisova lieriö; Maissipallo; T-muotoinen; Pisara; Vartalo/keho; Uppercut; Purkupallo; Muu
pt-PT: Forma do saco de treino: Angulado; Banana; Cilíndrico; Cilindro independente; Milho; Em forma de T; Lágrima; Tronco/corpo; Uppercut; Bola de demolição; Outra
vi: Hình dạng bao đấm/bao tập luyện: Góc cạnh; Trái chuối; Hình trụ; Trụ đứng tự do; Túi ngô; Hình chữ T; Hình giọt nước; Thân người; Đấm móc; Bóng tròn; Khác
en: Punching/training bag shape: Angled; Banana; Cylindrical; Freestanding cylinder; Maize; T-shaped; Teardrop; Torso/body; Uppercut; Wrecking ball; Other
tr: Boks/antrenman torbası şekli: Açılı; Muz; Silindirik; Ayaklı silindir; Mısır; T şeklinde; Gözyaşı damlası; Gövde/Vücut; Aparkat; Yıkım güllesi; Diğer
sk-SK: Tvar boxovacieho/tréningového vreca: Uhlový; Banán; Valcový; Voľne stojaci valec; Kvapka (maize); Tvar T; Slza; Trup/telo; Na zdviháky; Guľa; Iný
de: Form des Box- bzw. Trainingssacks: Abgewinkelt; Banane; Zylindrisch; Freistehender Zylinder; Maisbirne; T-förmig; Tropfenförmig; Torso/Körper; Uppercut; Abrissbirne; Sonstige
nb: Form på bokse-/treningssekk: Vinklet; Banan; Sylindrisk; Frittstående sylinder; Mais; T-formet; Dråpeformet; Torso/kropp; Uppercut; Kule; Annet